Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2306
Landlord; property; removal and storage; liability.

A landlord may leave personal property on the vacated premises or may remove and store the property in a place of safekeeping until the landlord either releases or disposes of the property pursuant to the Disposition of Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act. The landlord shall exercise reasonable care in storing the property but shall not be liable to the tenant or any other owner for any loss unless such loss is caused by the landlord's intentional or negligent act.

Laws 1991, LB 36, § 6.